Tennessee, session 114, SB1434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 148 of the Private Acts of 1983, as amended by Chapter 229 of
the Private Acts of 1984 and Chapter 9 of the Private Acts of 2011, and any other acts
amendatory thereto, is repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Knox County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the
presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB1434
001245
- 1 -